dictsource/te_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Telugu

// A means vowel letters (not vowel signs)
// B means a combining vowel sign or a virama


.replace
౦	0	// Convert Telugu numbers
౧	1
౨	2
౩	3
౪	4
౫	5
౬	6
౭	7
౮	8
౯	9

.L01 క ఖ గ ఘ ఙ   // velar
.L02 చ ఛ జ ఝ ఞ   // palatal
.L03 ట ఠ డ ఢ ణ   // retroflex
.L04 త థ ద ధ న   // dental

.group క
	క	ka
	క (B	k

.group ఖ
	ఖ	k#a
	ఖ (B	k#

.group గ
	గ	ga
	గ (B	g

.group ఘ
	ఘ	g#a
	ఘ (B	g#

.group ఙ
	ఙ	Na
	ఙ (B	N

.group చ
	చ	ca
	చ (B	c

.group ఛ
	ఛ	c#a
	ఛ (B	c#

.group జ
	జ	Ja
	జ (B	J
	జ్ఞ 	gna
	జ్ఞ (B	gn


.group ఝ
	ఝ	J#a
	ఝ (B	J#

.group ఞ
	ఞ	n^a
	ఞ (B	n^

.group ట
	ట	t.a
	ట (B	t.

.group ఠ
	ఠ	t.#a
	ఠ (B	t.#

.group డ
	డ	d.a
	డ (B	d.

.group ఢ
	ఢ	d.#a
	ఢ (B	d.#

.group ణ
	ణ	n.a
	ణ (B	n.

.group త
	త	ta
	త (B	t

.group థ
	థ	t#a
	థ (B	t#

.group ద
	ద	da
	ద (B	d

.group ధ
	ధ	d#a
	ధ (B	d#

.group న
	న	na
	న (B	n

.group ప
	ప	pa
	ప (B	p

.group ఫ
	ఫ	p#a
	ఫ (B	p#

.group బ
	బ	ba
	బ (B	b

.group భ
	భ	b#a
	భ (B	b#

.group మ
	మ	ma
	మ (B	m

.group య
	య	ja
	య (B	j

.group ర
	ర	ra
	ర (B	r

.group ఱ
	ఱ	ra
	ఱ (B	r

.group ల
	ల	la
	ల (B	l

.group ళ
	ళ	l.a
	ళ (B	l.

.group వ
	వ	v#a
	వ (B	v#

.group శ
	శ	S;a
	శ (B	S;

.group ష
	ష	s.a
	ష (B	s.

.group స
	స	sa
	స (B	s

.group హ
	హ	ha
	హ (B	h

.group ౘ
	ౘ	tsa
	ౘ (B	ts

.group ౙ
	ౙ	dza
	ౙ (B	dz

.group ౠ
	ౠ	ru

.group ౡ
	ౡ        l-


// Stand-alone vowels
.group అ
	అ	a

.group ఆ
	ఆ	a:

.group ఇ
	ఇ	i

.group ఈ
	ఈ	i:

.group ఉ
	ఉ	u

.group ఊ
	ఊ	u:

.group ఋ
	ఋ	ru

.group ఌ
	ఌ        l-

.group ఎ
	ఎ	e
     _) ఎ	;e

.group ఏ
	ఏ	e:

.group ఐ
	ఐ	aI

.group ఒ
	ఒ	o

.group ఓ
	ఓ	o:

.group ఔ
	ఔ	aU



.group 0xe0b0   // characters which start with UTF-8 bytes: [e0 b0]

.	ఁ 	n       // candrabindu

	ం(L01	N	// anusvara takes the place of the next consonant
	ం(L02	n^
	ం(L03	n.
	ం(L04	n
	ం	m

	ః	h	// visarga

// combining vowel signs

	ా	a:

	ి	i


.group 0xe0b1   // characters which start with UTF-8 bytes: [e0 b1]

	ీ	i:

	ు	u

	ూ	u:

	ృ	ru

	ౄ	r-:

	ె	e

	ే	e:

	ై	aI

	ొ	o

	ో	o:

	ౌ	aU

	్	// virama

	ౕ	:   // length mark ??
	ౖ	:   // ai length mark ??


.group
	$	d.a:lar
